Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 11

Department of General Services

4-3-1101. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of general services.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 24; Shan. Supp., § 373a62; Code 1932, § 286; Acts 1933, ch. 92, § 1(12); 1937, ch. 33, §§ 15, 31; 1939, ch. 11, §§ 10, 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.15; Acts 1953, ch. 163, § 1; 1959, ch. 9, § 5; 1961, ch. 97, §§ 1, 5; 1972, ch. 543, §§ 3, 7; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The department of general services, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of general services, §4-3-101.

4-3-1102. Commissioner.

The department of general services shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of general services.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 24; Shan. Supp., § 373a62; Code 1932, § 286; Acts 1933, ch. 92, § 1(12); 1937, ch. 33, § 15; 1939, ch. 11, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.15; Acts 1953, ch. 163, § 1; 1959, ch. 9, § 5; 1961, ch. 97, §§ 2, 5; 1972, ch. 543, § 7; modified.

4-3-1103. General functions.

The department of general services shall coordinate and administer the state's purchases, personal properties, printing and motor vehicle facilities, surplus property, postal services and general public works services, and will provide for state agencies all additional support services that are not assigned by law to specific departments.

Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-330; Acts 1981, ch. 499, § 4.

4-3-1104. Divisions — Creation.

In order to discharge the functions of this department, there are hereby created within the department the following divisions:

The food services management division;

The motor vehicle management division;

The photographic division;

The printing division;

The property services management division;

The public works division; and

The purchasing and administration division.

The commissioner shall assign to the divisions the functions and duties imposed upon the department. The commissioner may combine, consolidate or abolish any of the divisions, or create such new divisions as are necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon the department, subject to the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 6; T.C.A., § 4-330; Acts 1981, ch. 364, §§ 4, 5; 1983, ch. 429, § 6; 2008, ch. 717, § 1; 2013, ch. 207, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 457, § 7, which was added as §4-3-1012, provided for the transfer of the office of energy management, described in part 11 of this chapter, from the department of general services to the department of finance and administration, as to any functions related to the energy management program for state buildings and state-owned facilities. Section 7 of the act further provided that all staff, staff positions, equipment, supplies, property, funds and other resources of the functions referenced above shall be transferred to the department of finance and administration. Pursuant to section 7 of the act, energy management functions not related to state buildings and state-owned facilities shall remain with the department of general services.

Cross-References. Reorganization of divisions, §4-4-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Copyright status of photographs taken by Tennessee's photographic services personnel, OAG 07-130 (8/27/07), 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 130.

4-3-1105. Powers and duties.

The department of general services has the power and is required to:

Establish facilities for the testing of any materials, supplies or equipment purchased, or to be purchased, for this state or any of its departments, institutions or agencies, use the testing facilities of any other state department, institution or agency, and contract for testing services from any other private or public facility;

Sell supplies, materials and equipment that are surplus, obsolete or unused;

Have general care and supervision of all central storerooms operated by the state government, and establish and maintain such other central storerooms as may be necessary for the proper administration of title 12, chapter 3;

Establish, maintain and conduct a central mail room, central postage metering, and centralized outgoing mail services for all state departments, institutions and agencies located at the state capitol, except those exempted by the commissioner;

Prepare, publish and keep current a purchasing manual containing, among other things, the material provisions of title 12, chapter 3, the rules and regulations of the department and the procurement commission, and an explanation of the procedures followed in the handling and making of purchases and contracts under this part;

Exercise, with the approval of the procurement commission, all the rights, powers and duties vested by title 12, chapter 5;

Furnish, when requested, without cost, to the chief fiscal officer in each county and in each municipality of this state the current catalog or price listing of goods and materials, which the department may purchase for local government, by virtue of § 12-3-1201;

Supervise the maintenance of public buildings, including the state capitol and capitol annexes except as otherwise provided by § 4-8-101(a)(2), and of the capitol grounds, and the supplying of furniture and fixtures to these buildings;

Study the use of state-owned automobiles by the state departments, offices and agencies, and establish rules and regulations for the housing, repair and operation of such automobiles;

Make provisions for the centralization of such departmental services as mimeographing, duplicating, addressographing, copying, typesetting, copy preparation and binding, in order to save duplicate outlays for costly equipment used only part time;

Supervise and maintain all public memorials and monuments erected or owned by the state, except where the supervision and maintenance is otherwise provided by law;

Exercise general custodial care of all real property of the state;

Provide for the supervision of the planning, preparing and serving of food including, but not limited to, the training and supervision of state food service employees;

Exercise all functions previously exercised by the state educational agency for surplus property, as described in § 49-1-304;

Supervise and regulate parking in the main state employee parking lot at the base of Capitol Hill in Nashville, as well as any other state employee parking lots now in existence or hereafter created throughout the state, except as provided in § 4-8-201, the parking lot adjacent to the Supreme Court Building in Nashville that is utilized by the personnel employed in the Supreme Court Building, and the underground parking facility adjacent to the War Memorial Building in Nashville. Such regulation shall include, but not be limited to, issuance of parking stickers to state employees, assessment of civil penalties in the manner provided in § 4-8-203, and removal of unauthorized vehicles. Such regulations shall not be applicable to tourists with out-of-state tags;

Supervise the supplying of utilities to the state-owned buildings under the department's control and implement a system for monitoring and controlling the cost of such utilities;

Provide state vehicle energy management life-cycle (operational and maintenance) cost analysis;

Define and implement an energy efficiency code for state procurement of equipment and appliances;

Administer the state employee van pool program;

Prepare an annual report on the activities of the department concerning the definition and implementation of an energy efficiency code for state procurement of equipment and appliances. The department shall publish the report on the department's website and submit the report to the governor, the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, the chairs of the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives, and the chairs of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives, or their successor committees. The report shall include savings realized by the state as a result of the office's activities expressed in both units of energy saved and monetary cost-avoidance;

Implement and administer the procurement of energy-efficient motor vehicles as provided in this part; and

Impose a reasonable real estate transaction fee on all real estate transactions when the transaction is processed through the department of general services and to grant a fee waiver when deemed appropriate by the department. Said fee structure and waivers shall be subject to approval by the state building commission.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 20, 21; Shan. Supp., §§ 373a57, 373a58; Code 1932, §§ 281, 282; Acts 1933, ch. 92, §§ 1(8), 1(9); C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.31-255.42; Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 25, 29 (Williams, §§ 370.34, 370.38); modified; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; 1961, ch. 97, § 5; 1972, ch. 543, § 5; 1972, ch. 630, § 1; 1973, ch. 307, § 1; 1978, ch. 524, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-331; T.C.A., § 4-330; Acts 1981, ch. 499, §§ 3, 5; 1983, ch. 214, § 4; 1983, ch. 429, §§ 8, 19; 2000, ch. 561, § 4; 2001, ch. 109, § 1; 2007, ch. 72, § 1; 2007, ch. 532, § 2; 2008, ch. 717, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 106, §§ 1, 3; 2010, ch. 1062, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 19; 2012, ch. 604, § 3; 2013, ch. 236, § 3; 2013, ch. 454, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Former §12-3-1001, formerly referred to in this section, was transferred to §12-3-1201 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 68, effective July 1, 2013.

For an order transferring management and operation of the Division of Real Property Administration from the Department of Finance and Administration to the Department of General Services, see Executive Order No. 7 (September 30, 2011).

Acts 1981, ch. 503, § 11(43) (the general appropriations act) provided that:

“Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, each state employee presently required to pay a commuting charge for the use of a state automobile shall be required, upon passage of this act, to pay the cost to the state of owning and operating such vehicle, in accordance with a reimbursement rate established by the commissioner of finance and administration, which shall be no less than the rate paid to reimburse general state employees for mileage pursuant to the comprehensive travel regulations.”

Cross-References. Rules and regulations regarding motor vehicles to be developed by department of safety, §4-3-2007.

Security of state buildings and offices, division of protective services, §4-3-2006.

4-3-1106. Special police commissions.

The commissioner of general services shall be authorized to issue special police commissions to qualified state security personnel, who are full-time salaried employees of the state, to go armed or carry pistols while on active duty engaged in enforcing § 4-3-1105(8), (11), (12) and (15).

Such commissions shall only be issued by the commissioner to those personnel who have satisfactorily completed appropriate training and who are certified as qualified, including mental and physical competency, to carry firearms by the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy or other similar agency.

Acts 1977, ch. 209, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-330.

4-3-1107. Display of vehicle abuse hotline decal on vehicles managed by department of general services.

The department of general services shall ensure that all vehicles purchased or leased with funds appropriated by the state and managed by the department of general services for the use of any department, office, or agency of the state display a vehicle abuse hotline decal. This subsection (a) shall apply only to vehicles displaying a governmental service registration plate of distinctive design issued under § 55-4-219; provided, that this subsection (a) shall not apply to vehicles used by state law enforcement agencies or the department of military.

The decal shall contain a telephone number or website information through which complaints regarding potential misuse of a state vehicle, including speeding, texting and driving, or reckless driving, can be submitted.

The department shall establish and maintain a vehicle abuse hotline and website through which complaints regarding potential misuse of a state vehicle can be submitted. The department shall also establish procedures for notifying departments, offices, and agencies of the state regarding any complaints received and for responding as necessary to those persons submitting complaints.

The cost of implementation of this section shall be provided from within existing resources of the department.

Acts 2018, ch. 982, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 457, § 7, which was added as §4-3-1012, provided for the transfer of the office of energy management, described in part 11 of this chapter, from the department of general services to the department of finance and administration, as to any functions related to the energy management program for state buildings and state-owned facilities. Section 7 of the act further provided that all staff, staff positions, equipment, supplies, property, funds and other resources of the functions referenced above shall be transferred to the department of finance and administration. Pursuant to section 7 of the act, energy management functions not related to state buildings and state-owned facilities shall remain with the department of general services.

Former §4-3-1107, concerning development and implementation of an energy management program, was transferred to §4-3-1017 by Acts 2007, ch. 72, § 3, effective July 1, 2007.

The reference in subsection (a) to “55-4-223” was changed to “55-4-219” in light of the renumbering of that section pursuant to Acts 2018, ch. 1023, § 49.

4-3-1108. [Reserved.]

The commissioner shall encourage the acquisition of energy-efficient and alternative fuel motor vehicles in the fleet of state vehicles. Each year, every effort should be made to achieve a target goal that one hundred percent (100%) of newly purchased passenger motor vehicles be energy-efficient or alternative fuel motor vehicles. The department shall ensure that at least twenty-five percent (25%) of newly purchased passenger motor vehicles procured for use in areas designated by the United States environmental protection agency (EPA) as nonattainment areas shall be all electric or hybrid-electric vehicles or vehicles powered by natural gas or propane; provided, that such vehicles and fueling infrastructure are available at the time of procurement and such vehicles are purchased at competitive prices. In the event that such vehicles or fueling infrastructure is not available at the time of procurement, the department may instead meet this mandate by procuring compact fuel-efficient vehicles. In areas not designated by the EPA as nonattainment areas, the department shall ensure that at least twenty-five percent (25%) of newly purchased passenger motor vehicles are all electric or hybrid-electric vehicles, vehicles powered by natural gas or propane, or compact fuel-efficient vehicles; provided, that such vehicles are purchased at competitive prices.

Commencing June 30, 2013, the commissioner shall compile and maintain information on the nature of passenger motor vehicles that are owned and leased by the state, including, but not limited to:

The number of passenger motor vehicles purchased during the fiscal year categorized by energy-efficiency; and

The number of passenger motor vehicles owned as of June 30 of each year categorized by energy-efficiency.

The commissioner shall file an annual report with the governor and the general assembly concerning such passenger motor vehicles. The report shall include at a minimum:

Problems or concerns the state may have experienced in meeting the target goal set pursuant to subsection (a) relative to obtaining such energy-efficient motor vehicles;

Any savings or increased expenditures to the state in the purchase of, as well as the operation and maintenance cost of, such motor vehicles;

Plans for integrating energy-efficient motor vehicles identified in subdivisions (c)(1)(E) and (G) into the state passenger motor vehicle fleet;

The volume of gasoline or diesel displaced by the usage of energy-efficient or alternative fuel vehicles; and

The emissions reduction achieved by the usage of energy-efficient or alternative fuel vehicles.

The information compiled and maintained pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) shall be made accessible to the public on the department's website through a prominent link provided on the home page. In addition, the department shall submit an annual report containing the information compiled and maintained pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) to the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and to the chairs of the committees concerning government operations and to the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Energy-efficient motor vehicle” means a passenger motor vehicle that is:

An alternative fuel vehicle as defined by the Energy Policy Act of 1992 (P.L. 102-486);

A flexible fuel vehicle (FFV) utilizing ethanol, biodiesel, or any other commercially available alternative fuel approved by the United States department of energy;

A hybrid-electric vehicle (HEV);

A compact fuel-efficient vehicle, defined as a vehicle powered by unleaded gasoline that has a United States EPA estimated highway gasoline mileage rating of at least twenty-five miles per gallon (25 mpg) or greater for the model year purchased;

An electric vehicle (EV);

A vehicle powered by natural gas or propane; or

A vehicle powered by ultra low sulfur diesel fuel that meets Bin 5, Tier II emission standards mandated by the EPA and that has an EPA estimated highway mileage rating of at least thirty miles per gallon (30 mpg) or greater for the model year purchased; and

“Passenger motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle designed for carrying six (6) or fewer adult passengers and used for the transportation of persons; provided, that vans, including cargo vans, trucks, sport utility vehicles, and police pursuit vehicles shall not be considered passenger motor vehicles.

For purchases of vehicles that are not passenger motor vehicles, including cargo vans, trucks, and sport utility vehicles, the department is encouraged to make reasonable efforts to achieve a target goal that at least five percent (5%) of newly purchased vehicles are vehicles powered by natural gas or propane; provided, that such vehicles and fueling infrastructure are available at the time of procurement and such vehicles are purchased at competitive prices.

In order to facilitate the development of natural gas and propane fueling infrastructure, the department is authorized to participate in such pilot projects as may be necessary to ensure the availability of natural gas and propane fueling infrastructure throughout the interstate highway corridors in this state.

Acts 2007, ch. 532, § 1; 2009, ch. 529, §§ 7-13; 2012, ch. 604, § 4; 2013, ch. 236, § 4; 2013, ch. 423, § 2; 2014, ch. 591, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-1109 (Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 9), concerning solar hot water heaters in the energy management program, was repealed by Acts 1999, ch. 457, § 4, effective June 17, 1999.

Acts 2009, ch. 529, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Clean Energy Future Act of 2009.”

For the Preamble to the Tennessee Clean Energy Future Act of 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 529.

Acts 2009, ch. 529, § 30 provided that the provisions of the act, which amended subsection (a), added subdivision (b)(2)(C), amended subdivision (c)(1)(D), and added subdivisions (c)(1)(E)-(G), shall be subject to sunset review pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, in 2014.

Acts 2013, ch. 423, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Energy Independence Act of 2013.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning alternative fuel vehicles and fueling infrastructure, please refer to Acts 2013, ch. 423.

4-3-1110. [Reserved.]

4-3-1112. Rain forest materials and products — Study of purchases — Reduction or elimination.

The commissioner of general services is requested to conduct a study of the purchase by the state of any materials or products having their origin in raw materials derived from the endangered rain forest and how the state might reduce or eliminate the purchase of such materials or products. The commissioner is also requested to purchase non-rain forest products if comparable in quality and cost to products derived from endangered rain forests.

Acts 1992, ch. 1010, § 1.

4-3-1113. Lighting of Tennessee Tower.

The commissioner of general services shall, whenever practicable, provide the lighting patterns of the Tennessee Tower in Nashville for holidays and for appropriate messages from local nonprofit organizations and causes.

Acts 1997, ch. 454, § 1.

4-3-1114. Emergency keyed lock boxes next to functioning elevators.

Not later than November 28, 2005, each state-owned public building under the department's control, including the state capitol and capitol annexes, must ensure that an emergency keyed lock box is installed next to each bank of functioning elevators located on the main level. Such lock boxes shall be permanently mounted seventy-two inches (72") from the floor to the center of the box, be operable by a universal key, no matter where such box is located, and shall contain only fire service keys and drop keys to the appropriate elevators. General standards for the design of such boxes shall be approved by the department of labor and workforce development not later than July 31, 2005; provided, however, that such standards must be consistent with all applicable building and life safety standards governing the facility.

Failure to comply with this section shall be a Class C misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by a fine only of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

Acts 2005, ch. 404, § 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.